Utah statutes.
26-8a-505.   Service interruption or cessation -- Receivership -- Default coverage -- Notice.

(1)  Acting in the public interest, the department may petition the district court where an ambulance or paramedic provider operates or the district court with jurisdiction in Salt Lake County to appoint the department or an independent receiver to continue the operations of a provider upon any one of the following conditions:

(a)  the provider ceases or intends to cease operations;

(b)  the provider becomes insolvent;

(c)  the department has initiated proceedings to revoke the provider's license and has determined that the lives, health, safety, or welfare of the population served within the provider's exclusive geographic service area are endangered because of the provider's action or inaction pending a full hearing on the license revocation; or

(d)  the department has revoked the provider's license and has been unable to adequately arrange for another provider to take over the provider's exclusive geographic service area.

(2)  If a licensed or designated provider ceases operations or is otherwise unable to provide services, the department may arrange for another licensed provider to provide services on a temporary basis until a license is issued.

(3)  A licensed provider shall give the department 30 days notice of its intent to cease operations.



Enacted by Chapter 141, 1999 General Session

